Oklahoma, session 2026, SB780.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 376 of Title 21, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section, the terms “flag”, “standard”,
“colors”, or “ensign” of the United States shall have the same
meaning as used in subsection C of Section 372 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
B. Any person who takes down or removes the flag, standard,
colors, or ensign of the United States of America on public property
or private property owned by another person or entity without
permission and puts up the flag, standard, colors, or ensign of any
other entity shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a felony
punishable by a fine not to exceed Three Thousand Dollars
($3,000.00), imprisonment in the custody of the Department of
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB780 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Corr ections for not more than three (3) years, or by both such fine
and imprisonment.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON PUBLIC SAFETY
February 11, 2025 - DO PASS




















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB780 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)